Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1505
Sale
of cigarettes; cost to wholesaler; filing with division.

(1)
Cost to the wholesaler shall mean the basic cost of cigarettes to the wholesaler
plus the cost of doing business by the wholesaler, as evidenced by the standards
and methods of accounting regularly employed by him or her in his or her allocation
of overhead costs and expenses, paid or incurred, and must include, without
limitation, labor costs, including salaries of executives and officers, rent,
depreciation, selling costs, maintenance of equipment, delivery costs, all
types of licenses, taxes, insurance, and advertising.

(2) In the
absence of the filing with the division of satisfactory proof of a lesser
or higher cost of doing business by the wholesaler making the sale, the cost
of doing business by the wholesaler shall be presumed to be four and three-quarters
percent of the basic cost of cigarettes to the wholesaler.

Laws
1965, c. 364, § 5, p. 1188;

Laws 2008, LB898, § 2.